Hawaii statutes.
[§431:1-217] Insurance policies
issued to construction professionals. (a) For purposes of a liability
insurance policy that covers occurrences of damage or injury during the policy
period and that insures a construction professional for liability arising from
construction-related work, the meaning of the term "occurrence" shall
be construed in accordance with the law as it existed at the time that the
insurance policy was issued.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision to the
contrary, this section shall apply to surplus lines insurance as defined by
section 431:8-102.

(c) Any provision of an insurance policy
issued in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable as against
public policy.

(d) This section shall apply to all liability
insurance policies issued and in effect as of [June 3, 2011].

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Construction professional" means a
person, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability
corporation, or other entity that engages in an activity intended to assist in
the development, construction, or repair of an improvement to real property,
including a contractor licensed pursuant to chapter 444, a building owner, or a
developer of a project regardless of whether the person or entity maintains a
professional license.

"Liability insurance policy" means a
contract of insurance including an owner-controlled, contractor-controlled, or
other similar pooled insurance program that covers occurrences of damage or
injury during the policy period and that insures a construction professional
for liability arising from construction-related work. [L 2011, c 83, §2]

Case Notes

Subsection (a) required that commercial general liability
umbrella policies in question, issued by plaintiff insurers in 2007, be
interpreted under the law as it existed in 2007; even if this statute
ostensibly nullified the Hawaii intermediate court of appeals' decision in
Group Builders by "restoring" pre-Group Builders law, the statute did
not purport to nullify any decision preceding Group Builders; thus, the
policies in issue continued to fall under the Ninth Circuit's 2004 analysis in
Burlington. 870 F. Supp. 2d 1015 (2012).

Pursuant to subsection (a), the court could not construe the
meaning of the term "occurrence" based on the holding in Group
Builders because the case was decided on May 19, 2010, and was not in existence
when plaintiff issued the general liability insurance policies, the most recent
of which took effect on January 18, 2010. The operative case law was that
which existed at the time plaintiff issued the first policy, which took effect
on November 11, 2002. 891 F. Supp. 2d 1179 (2012).

Cited: 955 F. Supp. 2d 1121 (2013).

Mentioned: 829 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next